Illinois, session 104th, HB3859.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 10-2.1-4 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-4)  (from Ch. 24, par. 10-2.1-4)7    Sec. 10-2.1-4. Fire and police departments; appointment of 8members; certificates of appointments. The board of fire and 9police commissioners shall appoint all officers and members of 10the fire and police departments of the municipality, including 11the chief of police and the chief of the fire department, 12unless the council or board of trustees shall by ordinance as 13to them otherwise provide; except as otherwise provided in 14this Section, and except that in any municipality which adopts 15or has adopted this Division 2.1 and also adopts or has adopted 16Article 5 of this Code, the chief of police and the chief of 17the fire department shall be appointed by the municipal 18manager, if it is provided by ordinance in such municipality 19that such chiefs, or either of them, shall not be appointed by 20the board of fire and police commissioners.21    If the chief of the fire department or the chief of the 22police department or both of them are appointed in the manner 23provided by ordinance, they may be removed or discharged by   HB3859- 2 -LRB104 08147 RTM 18195 b1the appointing authority. In such case the appointing 2authority shall file with the corporate authorities the 3reasons for such removal or discharge, which removal or 4discharge shall not become effective unless confirmed by a 5majority vote of the corporate authorities.6    After January 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 7100-1126), a person shall not be appointed as the chief, the 8acting chief, the department head, or a position, by whatever 9title, that is responsible for day-to-day operations of a fire 10department for greater than 180 days unless he or she 11possesses the following qualifications and certifications:12        (1) Office of the State Fire Marshal Basic Operations 13    Firefighter Certification or Office of the State Fire 14    Marshal Firefighter II Certification; Office of the State 15    Fire Marshal Advanced Fire Officer Certification or Office 16    of the State Fire Marshal Fire Officer II Certification; 17    and an associate degree in fire science or a bachelor's 18    degree from an accredited university or college;19        (2) a current certification from the International 20    Fire Service Accreditation Congress or Pro Board Fire 21    Service Professional Qualifications System that meets the 22    National Fire Protection Association standard NFPA 1001, 23    Standard for Fire Fighter Professional Qualifications, 24    Level I job performance requirements; a current 25    certification from the International Fire Service 26    Accreditation Congress or Pro Board Fire Service   HB3859- 3 -LRB104 08147 RTM 18195 b1    Professional Qualifications System that meets the National 2    Fire Protection Association standard NFPA 1021, Standard 3    for Fire Officer Professional Qualifications, Fire Officer 4    II job performance requirements; and an associate degree 5    in fire science or a bachelor's degree from an accredited 6    university or college;7        (3) qualifications that meet the National Fire 8    Protection Association standard NFPA 1001, Standard for 9    Fire Fighter Professional Qualifications, Level I job 10    performance requirements; qualifications that meet the 11    National Fire Protection Association standard NFPA 1021, 12    Standard for Fire Officer Professional Qualifications, 13    Fire Officer II job performance requirements; and an 14    associate degree in fire science or a bachelor's degree 15    from an accredited university or college; or16        (4) a minimum of 10 years' experience as a firefighter 17    at the fire department in the jurisdiction making the 18    appointment. 19This paragraph applies to fire departments that employ 20firefighters hired under the provisions of this Division. On 21and after January 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 22100-1126), a home rule municipality may not appoint a fire 23chief, an acting chief, a department head, or a position, by 24whatever title, that is responsible for day-to-day operations 25of a fire department for greater than 180 days in a manner 26inconsistent with this paragraph. This paragraph is a   HB3859- 4 -LRB104 08147 RTM 18195 b1limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 2the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 3rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State.4    If a member of the department is appointed chief of police 5or chief of the fire department prior to being eligible to 6retire on pension, he shall be considered as on furlough from 7the rank he held immediately prior to his appointment as 8chief. If he resigns as chief or is discharged as chief prior 9to attaining eligibility to retire on pension, he shall revert 10to and be established in whatever rank he currently holds, 11except for previously appointed positions, and thereafter be 12entitled to all the benefits and emoluments of that rank, 13without regard as to whether a vacancy then exists in that 14rank.15    All appointments to each department other than that of the 16lowest rank, however, shall be from the rank next below that to 17which the appointment is made except as otherwise provided in 18this Section, and except that the chief of police and the chief 19of the fire department may be appointed from among members of 20the police and fire departments, respectively, regardless of 21rank, unless the council or board of trustees shall have by 22ordinance as to them otherwise provided. A chief of police or 23the chief of the fire department, having been appointed from 24among members of the police or fire department, respectively, 25shall be permitted, regardless of rank, to take promotional 26exams and be promoted to a higher classified rank than he   HB3859- 5 -LRB104 08147 RTM 18195 b1currently holds, without having to resign as chief of police 2or chief of the fire department.3    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 4shall be vested in the Board of Fire and Police Commissioners 5and all certificates of appointments issued to any officer or 6member of the fire or police department of a municipality 7shall be signed by the chairman and secretary respectively of 8the board of fire and police commissioners of such 9municipality, upon appointment of such officer or member of 10the fire and police department of such municipality by action 11of the board of fire and police commissioners. After being 12selected from the register of eligibles to fill a vacancy in 13the affected department, each appointee shall be presented 14with his or her certificate of appointment on the day on which 15he or she is sworn in as a classified member of the affected 16department. Firefighters who were not issued a certificate of 17appointment when originally appointed shall be provided with a 18certificate within 10 days after making a written request to 19the chairperson of the Board of Fire and Police Commissioners. 20In any municipal fire department that employs full-time 21firefighters and is subject to a collective bargaining 22agreement, a person who has not qualified for regular 23appointment under the provisions of this Division 2.1 shall 24not be used as a temporary or permanent substitute for 25classified members of a municipality's fire department or for 26regular appointment as a classified member of a municipality's   HB3859- 6 -LRB104 08147 RTM 18195 b1fire department unless mutually agreed to by the employee's 2certified bargaining agent. Such agreement shall be considered 3a permissive subject of bargaining. Municipal fire departments 4covered by the changes made by Public Act 95-490 that are using 5non-certificated employees as substitutes immediately prior to 6June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-490) may, by 7mutual agreement with the certified bargaining agent, continue 8the existing practice or a modified practice and that 9agreement shall be considered a permissive subject of 10bargaining. A home rule unit may not regulate the hiring of 11temporary or substitute members of the municipality's fire 12department in a manner that is inconsistent with this Section. 13This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 14of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 15exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 16by the State. 17    The term "policemen" as used in this Division does not 18include auxiliary police officers except as provided for in 19Section 10-2.1-6.20    Any full-time member of a regular fire or police 21department of any municipality which comes under the 22provisions of this Division or adopts this Division 2.1 or 23which has adopted any of the prior Acts pertaining to fire and 24police commissioners, is a city officer.25    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, the 26Chief of Police of a department in a non-home rule   HB3859- 7 -LRB104 08147 RTM 18195 b1municipality of more than 130,000 inhabitants may, without the 2advice or consent of the Board of Fire and Police 3Commissioners, appoint up to 6 officers who shall be known as 4deputy chiefs or assistant deputy chiefs, and whose rank shall 5be immediately below that of Chief. The deputy or assistant 6deputy chiefs may be appointed from (i) any rank of sworn 7officers of that municipality or (ii) any rank of sworn 8officers of any other municipality. If the appointee is a 9sworn officer of a municipality other than the municipality to 10which the appointee is being appointed, then the appointee 11must also have at least 5 years of full-time service as a 12police officer. No , but no person who does not meet the 13requirements of this paragraph is not such a sworn officer may 14be so appointed. Such deputy chief or assistant deputy chief 15shall have the authority to direct and issue orders to all 16employees of the Department holding the rank of captain or any 17lower rank. A deputy chief of police or assistant deputy chief 18of police, having been appointed from any rank of sworn 19officers of that municipality, shall be permitted, regardless 20of rank, to take promotional exams and be promoted to a higher 21classified rank than he currently holds, without having to 22resign as deputy chief of police or assistant deputy chief of 23police.24    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 25non-home rule municipality of 130,000 or fewer inhabitants, 26through its council or board of trustees, may, by ordinance,   HB3859- 8 -LRB104 08147 RTM 18195 b1provide for a position of deputy chief to be appointed by the 2chief of the police department. The ordinance shall provide 3for no more than one deputy chief position if the police 4department has fewer than 25 full-time police officers and for 5no more than 2 deputy chief positions if the police department 6has 25 or more full-time police officers. The deputy chief 7position shall be an exempt rank immediately below that of 8Chief. The deputy chief may be appointed from (i) any rank of 9sworn, full-time officers of the municipality's police 10department or (ii) any rank of sworn, full-time officers of 11any other municipality's police department. In either case, 12the appointee , but must also have at least 5 years of full-time 13service as a police officer in that department. A deputy chief 14shall serve at the discretion of the Chief and, if removed from 15the position, shall revert to the rank currently held, without 16regard as to whether a vacancy exists in that rank. A deputy 17chief of police, having been appointed from any rank of sworn 18full-time officers of that municipality's police department, 19shall be permitted, regardless of rank, to take promotional 20exams and be promoted to a higher classified rank than he 21currently holds, without having to resign as deputy chief of 22police.23    No municipality having a population less than 1,000,000 24shall require that any firefighter appointed to the lowest 25rank serve a probationary employment period of longer than one 26year. The limitation on periods of probationary employment   HB3859- 9 -LRB104 08147 RTM 18195 b1provided in Public Act 86-990 is an exclusive power and 2function of the State. Pursuant to subsection (h) of Section 6 3of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution, a home rule 4municipality having a population less than 1,000,000 must 5comply with this limitation on periods of probationary 6employment, which is a denial and limitation of home rule 7powers. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 8Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 9extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 10employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 11sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 12hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 13licensure.14    To the extent that this Section or any other Section in 15this Division conflicts with Section 10-2.1-6.3 or 10-2.1-6.4, 16then Section 10-2.1-6.3 or 10-2.1-6.4 shall control. 17(Source: P.A. 100-252, eff. 8-22-17; 100-425, eff. 8-25-17; 18100-863, eff, 8-14-18; 100-1126, eff. 1-1-19; 101-81, eff. 197-12-19.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.